ru: Уровень приглушения: Очень высокий; Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое
vi: Mức độ suy giảm âm thanh: Rất cao; Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Khác
de: Dämpfungsgrad: Extra hoch; Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Ниво на заглушаване: Много високо; Високо; Ниско; Средно; Друго
lt-LT: Slopintuvo slopinimo lygis: Labai aukštas; Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
fr: Niveau d’atténuation de la sourdine: Très élevé; Élevé; Faible; Moyen; Autre
hu: Hangtompítási szint: Különösen magas; Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
es: Nivel de atenuación del silenciador: Extralto; Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otro
sl-SI: Raven dušenja dušilca: Zelo visoko; Visoko; Nizko; Srednje; Drugo
ro-RO: Nivelul de atenuare a sunetului: Extra ridicat; Ridicat; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
nb: Nivå for demping av lyd: Ekstra høyt; Høyt; Lavt; Middels; Annet
pt-PT: Nível de atenuação do som silenciado: Extra alta; Alta; Baixa; Média; Outro
cs: Úroveň útlumu ztlumení: Extra vysoká; Vysoká; Nízká; Střední; Ostatní
th: ระดับการลดทอนเสียงเงียบ: สูงพิเศษ; สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
sv: Dämpningsnivå för cymbaldämpare: Extra hög; Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
fi: Vaimennustaso: Erittäin korkea; Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Muu
ja: ミュート減衰レベル: 特高; 高; 低; 中; その他
it: Livello di attenuazione del sordino: Molto alto; Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
tr: Susturma azaltma seviyesi: Ekstra yüksek; Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
pt-BR: Mudo nível de atenuação: Muito alto; Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
en: Mute attenuation level: Extra high; High; Low; Medium; Other
zh-CN: 弱音器衰减等级: 极高; 高; 低; 中; 其他
sk-SK: Úroveň útlmu tlmiča: Extra vysoké; Vysoké; Nízke; Stredné; Iné
pl: Poziom tłumienia tłumika: Bardzo wysoki; Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inne
zh-TW: 弱音器衰減等級: 極高; 高; 低; 中; 其他
da: Lyddæmpningsniveau: Ekstra høj; Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
nl: Demper verzwakkingsniveau: Extra hoog; Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Anders
hr-HR: Razina prigušenja zvuka: Iznimno visoko; Visoko; Nisko; Srednje; Ostalo
ko: 뮤트 감쇠 레벨: 매우 높음; 높음; 낮음; 중간; 기타
el: Επίπεδο εξασθένησης σιγαστήρα: Πολύ υψηλό; Υψηλό; Χαμηλό; Μεσαίο; Άλλο